Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-254
School and federal lands; exchange; lease; renewal; removal of improvements.

Any lands so received and patented from the United States shall be held as a part of the educational lands of this state, and shall be subject to all existing laws pertaining to such lands; Provided, that such lands, so received in exchange, shall only be subject to lease for terms not exceeding twelve years, with the privilege of renewing for a like term in the option of the board. Such leases may also include the right to the lessee of removing all improvements he may have erected on the land.

Laws 1917, c. 212, § 2, p. 519;

C.S.1922, § 5212;

Laws 1925, c. 134, § 1, p. 353;

C.S.1929, § 72-232;

R.S.1943, § 72-254;

Laws 1963, c. 418, § 2, p. 1343.

Right of lessee to remove all improvements he may have erected is recognized. State v. Platte Valley P. P. & I. Dist., 147 Neb. 289, 23 N.W.2d 300 (1946).